Utah statutes.
35A-3-106.   Residency requirements.

To be eligible for public assistance under this chapter, an applicant shall be living in Utah voluntarily with the intention of making this state the applicant's place of residence, and not for a temporary purpose.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

